Maine, session 132, LD1009.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 12 MRSA §11103, as amended by PL 2021, c. 54, §6, is further amended to
read:
§11103. Prohibition for convicted felons, domestic violence offenders and certain
nonviolent juvenile offenders
A person who is prohibited from possessing a firearm under Title 15, section 393,
subsection 1, 1‑A or 1‑B is ineligible to obtain or possess any license or permit issued by
the department that authorizes a person to hunt with a firearm unless that person possesses
a valid permit in accordance with Title 15, section 393, subsection 2 or has had that person's
civil rights relating to firearm possession restored under Title 15, section 396.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §393, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2023, c. 491, §§1 to 8 and c.
675, §1, is further amended to read:
1. Possession prohibited. A Except as provided in section 396, a person may not
own, possess or have under that person's control a firearm, unless that person has obtained
a permit under this section, if that person:
A-1. Has been convicted of committing or found not criminally responsible by reason
of insanity of committing:
(1) A crime in this State that is punishable by imprisonment for a term of one year
or more;
(2) A crime under the laws of the United States that is punishable by imprisonment
for a term exceeding one year;
(3) A crime under the laws of another jurisdiction that, in accordance with the laws
of that jurisdiction, is punishable by a term of imprisonment exceeding one year.
This subparagraph does not include a crime under the laws of another jurisdiction
that is classified by the laws of that jurisdiction as a misdemeanor and is punishable
by a term of imprisonment of 2 years or less;
(4) A crime under the laws of another jurisdiction that, in accordance with the laws
of that jurisdiction, does not come within subparagraph (3) but is elementally
substantially similar to a crime in this State that is punishable by a term of
imprisonment of one year or more; or
(5) A crime under the laws of this State or another jurisdiction in a proceeding in
which the prosecuting authority was required to plead and prove that the person
committed the crime with the use of:
(a) A firearm against a person; or
(b) Any other dangerous weapon.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class B crime;
C. Has been adjudicated in this State or under the laws of another jurisdiction to have
engaged in conduct as a juvenile that, if committed by an adult, would have been a
disqualifying conviction:
(1) Under paragraph A‑1, subparagraphs (1) to (4) and bodily injury to another
person was threatened or resulted; or
Page 1 - 132LR1532(01)

(3) Under paragraph A‑1, subparagraph (5).
Violation of this paragraph is a Class C crime;
D. Is subject to an order of a court of this State or another jurisdiction that restrains
that person from harassing, stalking or threatening an intimate partner, as defined in 18
United States Code, Section 921(a), of that person or a child of the intimate partner of
that person, or from engaging in other conduct that would place the intimate partner in
reasonable fear of bodily injury to the intimate partner or the child, except that this
paragraph applies only to a court order that was issued after a hearing for which that
person received actual notice and at which that person had the opportunity to participate
and that:
(1) Includes a finding that the person represents a credible threat to the physical
safety of an intimate partner or a child; or
(2) By its terms, explicitly prohibits the use, attempted use or threatened use of
physical force against an intimate partner or a child that would reasonably be
expected to cause bodily injury.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class C crime;
E. Has been:
(1) Committed involuntarily to a hospital pursuant to an order of the District Court
under Title 34‑B, section 3864 because the person was found to present a likelihood
of serious harm, as defined under Title 34‑B, section 3801, subsection 4‑A,
paragraphs A to C;
(2) Found not criminally responsible by reason of insanity with respect to a
criminal charge; or
(3) Found not competent to stand trial with respect to a criminal charge.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class C crime;
E-1. Is currently a restricted person pursuant to Title 34‑B, section 3862‑A, subsection
4 or Title 34‑B, section 3862‑A, subsection 6, paragraph D or a similar order issued by
another jurisdiction, except that the prohibition applies to possession and control and
not ownership. A permit issued pursuant to subsection 2 is not a defense to a violation
of this paragraph. Violation of this paragraph is a Class D crime;
E-2. Has been ordered to participate in a progressive treatment program pursuant to
Title 34‑B, section 3873‑A and, as part of that order, directed not to possess a
dangerous weapon pursuant to Title 34‑B, section 3873‑A, subsection 7‑A for the
duration of the treatment program, except that the prohibition applies to possession and
control, and not ownership. Violation of this paragraph is a Class D crime;
F. Is a fugitive from justice. For the purposes of this paragraph, "fugitive from justice"
has the same meaning as in section 201, subsection 4. Violation of this paragraph is a
Class C crime;
G. Is an unlawful user of or is addicted to any controlled substance and as a result is
prohibited from possession of a firearm under 18 United States Code, Section
922(g)(3). Notwithstanding the prohibition under 18 United States Code, Section
922(g)(3), the use, possession or transport of cannabis in accordance with Title 22,
Page 2 - 132LR1532(01)

413 chapter 558‑C or Title 28‑B may not serve as the basis for the prohibition to own,
424 possess or have under a person's control a firearm in this section. Violation of this
435 paragraph is a Class C crime;
H. Is an alien who is illegally or unlawfully in the United States or who was admitted
under a nonimmigrant visa and who is prohibited from possession of a firearm under
18 United States Code, Section 922(g)(5). Violation of this paragraph is a Class C
crime;
I. Has been discharged from the United States Armed Forces under dishonorable
conditions. Violation of this paragraph is a Class C crime; or
J. Has, having been a citizen of the United States, renounced that person's citizenship.
Violation of this paragraph is a Class C crime.
For the purposes of this subsection, a person is deemed to have been convicted upon the
acceptance of a plea of guilty or nolo contendere or a verdict or finding of guilty, or of the
equivalent in a juvenile case, by a court of competent jurisdiction.
In the case of a deferred disposition, a person is deemed to have been convicted when the
court imposes the sentence. In the case of a deferred disposition for a person alleged to
have committed one or more of the offenses listed in section 1023, subsection 4, paragraph
B‑1, that person may not possess a firearm during the deferred disposition period. Violation
of this paragraph is a Class C crime.
For the purposes of this subsection, a person is deemed to have been found not criminally
responsible by reason of insanity upon the acceptance of a plea of not criminally
responsible by reason of insanity or a verdict or finding of not criminally responsible by
reason of insanity, or of the equivalent in a juvenile case, by a court of competent
jurisdiction.
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §396 is enacted to read:
§396. Restoration of civil rights relating to firearm possession
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Another jurisdiction" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection
3-B.
B. "Department" means the Department of Public Safety.
C. "Felony crime" means:
(1) A crime in this State that is punishable by imprisonment for a term of one year
or more;
(2) A crime under the laws of the United States that is punishable by imprisonment
for a term exceeding one year;
(3) A crime under the laws of another jurisdiction that, in accordance with the laws
of that jurisdiction, is punishable by a term of imprisonment exceeding one year,
not including a crime under the laws of another jurisdiction that is classified by the
laws of that jurisdiction as a misdemeanor and is punishable by a term of
imprisonment of 2 years or less; or
Page 3 - 132LR1532(01)

(4) A crime under the laws of another jurisdiction that, in accordance with the laws
of that jurisdiction, does not come within subparagraph (3) but is elementally
substantially similar to a crime in this State that is punishable by a term of
imprisonment of one year or more.
D. "Final discharge" means the completion by a person of all authorized sentences
imposed as a result of a criminal conviction, including, but not limited to, a sentence
of imprisonment, a period of administrative release, a period of supervised release, a
period of probation, community service and the full payment of any fine or restitution.
E. "Firearm" has the same meaning as in Title 17-A, section 2, subsection 12-A.
2. Eligibility for restoration of civil rights. Except as provided in subsection 5, a
person prohibited pursuant to the federal Gun Control Act of 1968, 18 United States Code,
Section 922(g)(1) or section 393, subsection 1, paragraph A-1 or C from owning,
possessing or having under the person's control a firearm as the result of a criminal
conviction or adjudication by a court in this State, 10 years after the date of final discharge
from any sentence imposed as a result of the conviction or adjudication, becomes eligible
to apply for a restoration of the person's civil rights in accordance with subsection 3. To be
eligible for a restoration of civil rights under subsection 3, a person must satisfy the
following conditions:
A. The person has not been convicted or adjudicated of a felony crime in this State or
in another jurisdiction prior to or concurrently with the underlying conviction or
adjudication;
B. The person has not been convicted or adjudicated of any crime in this State or in
another jurisdiction for a period of 10 years since the date of final discharge from any
sentence imposed as a result of the underlying conviction or adjudication and is not
subject to any adjudication for committing a crime in this State or in another
jurisdiction; and
C. The underlying criminal conviction or adjudication is for a Class B or Class C crime,
except that if the underlying conviction or adjudication is for any of the following Class
B or Class C crimes, the person is not eligible to apply under subsection 3:
(1) Any Class B or Class C crime in violation of Title 17-A, chapter 9, 11, 12, 13,
33 or 45;
(2) Robbery in violation of Title 17-A, section 651;
(3) Assault on an officer in violation of Title 17-A, section 752-A;
(4) Assault on an emergency medical services person in violation of Title 17-A,
section 752-C;
(5) Assault on a firefighter in violation of Title 17-A, section 752-E;
(6) Aggravated sex trafficking in violation of Title 17-A, section 852; or
(7) Sex trafficking in violation of Title 17-A, section 853.
3. Application for restoration of civil rights. A person meeting the eligibility
requirements of subsection 2 may submit a request to the department to have restored the
person's right to own, possess and have under the person's control a firearm. Upon receipt
of a request, the department shall conduct a review of the person's criminal history to ensure
Page 4 - 132LR1532(01)

413 the person is eligible under subsection 2. Upon a determination that the person is eligible,
424 the department shall notify the court having jurisdiction over the crime on which the
435 person's firearm prohibition is based, and that court shall issue an order restoring the
446 person's right to own, possess and have under the person's control a firearm.
4. Effect of restoration. Except as provided in subsection 5, if a court issues an order
restoring the civil rights of a person pursuant to subsection 3, that person is no longer
prohibited from owning, possessing or having under that person's control a firearm under
section 393, subsection 1, paragraph A-1 or C. Restoration of civil rights under this section
is within the meaning of civil rights restored under the federal Firearms Owners' Protection
Act, 18 United States Code, Section 921(a)(20).
5. Subsequent conviction. If a person who has had the person's civil rights restored
under this section is subsequently convicted of any felony crime in this State or in another
jurisdiction, the person's right to own, possess and have under that person's control a
firearm is revoked, the person is ineligible from qualifying for a restoration of civil rights
under this section and the court that issued the order restoring the person's rights under
subsection 3 shall revoke the order.